apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<pardef n="ham/mar__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>maren</l>     <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mar</l>       <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mut/ter__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>terne</l>     <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rer</l>       <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>terer</l>     <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tere</l>      <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>teren</l>     <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gyg/er__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eren</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="døger__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="numer/us__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iene</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usene</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_'__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/ang__n">
  <e>       <p><l>engene</l>    <r>ang<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enger</l>     <r>ang<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anga</l>      <r>ang<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>ang<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>engene</l>    <r>ang<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enger</l>     <r>ang<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>angen</l>     <r>ang<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>ang<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="apsi/s__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dene</l>      <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sene</l>      <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>der</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_'__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sur/a__n">
  <e>       <p><l>aene</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ene</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aer</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aen</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>een</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="då__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="innspilling"><i>innspilling</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="alderdomsvakhet"><i>alderdomsvakhet</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="ettertid">        <i>ettertid</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="blanding">        <i>blanding</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="gran">            <i>gran</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="fortelling">      <i>fortelling</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="leiing">          <i>leiing</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="selvstendighet">  <i>selvstendighet</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="seter">           <i>set</i><par n="gyg/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="utforming">       <i>utforming</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="utvikling">       <i>utvikling</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="trygghet">        <i>trygghet</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="fritid">          <i>fritid</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="tetthet"><i>tetthet</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="døger"><i>døger</i><par n="døger__n"/></e>
<e lm="høyblokk"> <par n="høy_LR_høg"/><i>blokk</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apsis"><i>apsi</i><par n="apsi/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auksjonshammar"><i>auksjonsham</i><par n="ham/mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avgjerd"><i>avgjerd</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berghammar"><i>bergham</i><par n="ham/mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blenderåpning"><i>blenderåpning</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="calypsotakt"><i>calypsotakt</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dypbergart"><i>dypbergart</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forplikting"><i>forplikting</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frigjøring"><i>frigjøring</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gråolder"><i>gråold</i><par n="gyg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hammar"><i>ham</i><par n="ham/mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heimedatamaskin"><i>heimedatamaskin</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hikstelatter"><i>hikstelat</i><par n="mut/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hånlatter"><i>hånlat</i><par n="mut/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jamdøger"><i>jamdøger</i><par n="døger__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jamføring"><i>jamføring</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klinkhammar"><i>klinkham</i><par n="ham/mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kløvmeis"><i>kløvmeis</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krampelatter"><i>krampelat</i><par n="mut/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lasting"><i>lasting</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="latter"><i>lat</i><par n="mut/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="læger"><i>læger</i><par n="døger__n"/></e>
    <e lm="matlagingsmaskin"><i>matlagingsmaskin</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="numerus"><i>numer</i><par n="numer/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="older"><i>old</i><par n="gyg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oppvaskmaskin"><i>oppvaskmaskin</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pennhammar"><i>pennham</i><par n="ham/mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reit"><i>reit</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="setthammar"><i>settham</i><par n="ham/mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sinkemaskin"><i>sinkemaskin</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slipemaskin"><i>slipemaskin</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smihammar"><i>smiham</i><par n="ham/mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stigningstakt"><i>stigningstakt</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sura"><i>sur</i><par n="sur/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svartolder"><i>svartold</i><par n="gyg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="temaskin"><i>temaskin</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trykklufthammar"><i>trykkluftham</i><par n="ham/mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tulling"><i>tulling</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="varmekraftmaskin"><i>varmekraftmaskin</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vengemutter"><i>vengemut</i><par n="mut/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrimaskin"><i>vrimaskin</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vårjamdøger"><i>vårjamdøger</i><par n="døger__n"/></e>
    <e lm="øksehammar"><i>økseham</i><par n="ham/mar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="framferd"><i>framferd</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="måling"><i>måling</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="never"><i>nev</i><par n="gyg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="selvbevissthet"><i>selvbevissthet</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jeg-bevissthet"><i>jeg-bevissthet</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="tykkhet"><i>tykkhet</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="barmark">         <i>barmark</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="formaning">       <i>formaning</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
<e lm="hulder">          <i>huld</i><par n="gyg/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="førerdyktighet">  <i>førerdyktighet</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
